hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX g N 54
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дардың:0
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]з sf:дардың:0
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]л sf:дардың:0
SFX g 0 дардың [аоуұыэ]м sf:дардың:0
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дердің:0
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дердің:0
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дердің:0
SFX g 0 дердің [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дердің:0
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ] sf:лардың:0
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]й sf:лардың:0
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]н sf:лардың:0
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]ң sf:лардың:0
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]р sf:лардың:0
SFX g 0 лардың [аоуұыэ]у sf:лардың:0
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лердің:0
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лердің:0
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:лердің:0
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:лердің:0
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лердің:0
SFX g 0 лердің [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лердің:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]б sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]в sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]г sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]д sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]к sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]п sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]с sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]т sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]х sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тардың [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тардың:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:тердің:0
SFX g 0 тердің [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:тердің:0
SFX H N 54
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ] sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]з sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]й sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]л sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]м sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]н sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]р sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ға [аоуұыэ]у sf:ға:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя] sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ге:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]б sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]в sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]г sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]д sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]к sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]қ sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]һ sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]п sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]с sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]т sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ф sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]х sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ц sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ч sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]ш sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 қа [аоуұыэ]щ sf:қа:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:ке:0
SFX H 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:ке:0
SFX h N 54
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарға:0
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарға:0
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарға:0
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарға:0
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарға:0
SFX h 0 дарға [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарға:0
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дерге:0
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дерге:0
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дерге:0
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дерге:0
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дерге:0
SFX h 0 дерге [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дерге:0
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ] sf:ларға:0
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларға:0
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларға:0
SFX h 0 ларға [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларға:0
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерге:0
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лерге:0
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лерге:0
SFX h 0 лерге [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лерге:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 тарға [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарға:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:терге:0
SFX h 0 терге [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:терге:0
SFX I N 54
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ді:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]з sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]й sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]л sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]м sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]н sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]р sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ды [аоуұыэ]у sf:ды:0
SFX I 0 ні [әеёиөүіюя] sf:ні:0
SFX I 0 ны [аоуұыэ] sf:ны:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:ті:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]б sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]в sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]г sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]д sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]к sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]қ sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]һ sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]п sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]с sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]т sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ф sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]х sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ц sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ч sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]ш sf:ты:0
SFX I 0 ты [аоуұыэ]щ sf:ты:0
