hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
адамден/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
азғантай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айтақыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айғыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алаулан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алмағайып/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
амнистияла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
апатай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
арбағыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
архив/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
астылы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аткөпір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аудитория/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
афоризм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аяғын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақнабат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аққылтан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
базынала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
балаусадай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
барабаншы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
басыбайлы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бая/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бейнелеген/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бетін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
борасындат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
былапыт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
біртоға/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бүкши/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұйра/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұқпаңда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
вагонше/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гидротехника/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дамыды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
деме/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
долбарлы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дүкілдет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дөңбектей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
елпілдет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
еркінсіт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
етші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жайсаң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жанжалшыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жасақтас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жаңбырша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жеткізетін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жорта/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жымырыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жүргізіс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жөке/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зорлаушы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
инструкция/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
каталашка/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
келіскен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кети/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
колхоздарыңа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кібіртікте/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күйлендір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күрлет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көзгөрекі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көнти/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
лайықта/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
лә/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
маманай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
маш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мемориал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мирабель/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мшелер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мүсінхана/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мәнерлендір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
насат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ншектерд/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оймақгүл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
орант/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
отын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
палуандай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пианист/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
процентті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
рамат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
реттет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сайлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сапарнама/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сауықшы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
селекция/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сиякөк/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
соғысқұмар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
суыроты/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сырлы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүйкел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сәйкес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тайпи/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таныт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таспала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тебеген/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
техникум/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
толқы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тосаңсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
трансляцияла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыйғыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тығыздаушы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тілдеткіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түзелттір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түнгі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түтікше/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұса/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тәрізден/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төселін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
факті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
функциясына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шабақтас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шаншыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шашқыздыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шерттір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шолтаңдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шыжғыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шыққанын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шұңқырай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ыртын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
экспериментші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
іскенжі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қадарынша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қайраттандыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қалпында/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қандырыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қараған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарғысшыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаужала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қақпақтал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қитықтыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қолбасы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қорытқыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қуатсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қылтың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырқыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құйтақандай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құрлы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үймелен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үрлеткіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұлыбритания/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұғыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әлеметт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өгейсіт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өсек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Жибек/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
